District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.10

Penalties.

Any person who wilfully violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under or order issued pursuant to this chapter or any person who wilfully in an application makes any false statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact shall be fined not less than $1,000 or double the amount of gain from the transaction, whichever is larger, but not more than $50,000; or such person may be imprisoned for no more than 6 months; or both, for each offense. Prosecution for violations of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Office of the Corporation Counsel.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 510, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(i), 28 DCR 2824
1981 Ed., § 45-1660.